Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.106

Settlement and payment of accounts—Authority to require testimony and evidence.

The director of financial management may, in his or her discretion, require any person presenting an account for settlement to be sworn before him or her, and to answer, orally or in writing, as to any facts relating to it.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5120; 1979 c 151 s 117; 1977 ex.s. c 144 s 11.]